California statutes. Vehicle Code
Local authorities in timing traffic signals may so regulate the timing thereof as to permit the movement of traffic in an orderly and safe manner at speeds slightly at variance from the speed otherwise applicable under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

22402.

The Department of Transportation may, in the manner provided in Section 22404 determine the maximum speed, not less than five miles per hour, which can be maintained with safety to any bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel on a state highway. Said department may also make a determination with reference to any other highway upon receiving a request therefor from the board of supervisors or road commissioner of the county, the governing body of the local authority having jurisdiction over the bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

22403.

Any local authority may, in the manner provided in Section 22404, determine the maximum speed, not less than five miles per hour, which can be maintained with safety to any bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel under its jurisdiction, or may request the Department of Transportation to make such determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

22404.

The Department of Transportation or local authority making a determination of the maximum safe speed upon a bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel shall first make an engineering investigation and shall hold a public hearing.

Notice of the time and place of the public hearing shall be posted upon the bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel at least five days before the date fixed for the hearing. Upon the basis of the investigation and all evidence presented at the hearing, the department or local authority shall determine by order in writing the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to the bridge, elevated
 structure, tube or tunnel. Thereupon, the authority having jurisdiction over the bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel shall erect and maintain suitable signs specifying the maximum speed so determined at a distance of not more than 500 feet from each end of the bridge, elevated structure, tube, tunnel, or any approach thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

22405.

(a) No person shall drive a vehicle on any bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel constituting a part of a highway, at a speed which is greater than the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to such structure.

(b) Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation of this section with respect to a sign erected under Section 22404, proof of the determination of the maximum speed by the Department of Transportation or local authority and the erection and maintenance of the speed signs shall constitute prima facie evidence of the maximum speed which can be maintained with
 safety to the bridge, elevated structure, tube, or tunnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

22406.

No person may drive any of the following vehicles on a highway at a speed in excess of 55 miles per hour:

(a) A motortruck or truck tractor having three or more axles or any motortruck or truck tractor drawing any other vehicle.

(b) A passenger vehicle or bus drawing any other vehicle.

(c) A schoolbus transporting any school pupil.

(d) A farm labor vehicle when transporting passengers.

(e) A vehicle transporting explosives.

(f) A trailer bus, as defined in Section 636.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 787, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22406.1.

(a) A person who operates a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, upon a highway at a speed exceeding a posted speed limit established under this code by 15 miles per hour or more, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A person who holds a commercial driver’s license, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 15210, and operates a noncommerical motor vehicle upon a highway at a speed exceeding a
 posted speed limit established under this code by 15 miles per hour or more, is guilty of an infraction.

(c) A violation of either subdivision (a) or (b) is a “serious traffic violation,” as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 15210, and is subject to the sanctions provided under Section 15306 or 15308, in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(d) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (d).)
-------------------------------------------

22406.5.

Any person who drives a tank vehicle subject to Division 14.7 (commencing with Section 34000) while transporting more than 500 gallons of flammable liquid at a speed greater than the applicable speed limit or in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is, in addition to any other applicable penalty, subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for a first offense and, for a second or subsequent offense within two years of a prior offense, to a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and a suspension of up to six months of a hazardous materials or cargo tank endorsement, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1043, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22407.

Whenever the Department of Transportation or local authority determines upon the basis of engineering studies and a traffic survey that the speed of 55 miles per hour is more than is reasonable or safe for vehicles mentioned in subdivision (a) of Section 22406, which have a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or more, in descending a grade upon any portion of a highway, the department or local authority, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdiction, may determine and declare a speed limit of 50, 45, 40, 35, 30, 25, or 20 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate to facilitate the orderly movement of traffic
 and is reasonable and safe, which declared speed limit shall be effective for such vehicles when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22409.

No person shall operate any vehicle equipped with any solid tire when such vehicle has a gross weight as set forth in the following table at any speed in excess of the speed set forth opposite such gross weight:When gross weightMaximum speedof vehicle andin miles load is:per hour:10,000 lbs. or more but less than 16,000 lbs. 2516,000 lbs. or more but less than 22,000 lbs. 1522,000 lbs. or more 12

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

22410.

No person shall operate any vehicle equipped with any metal tire in contact with the surface of the highway at a speed in excess of six miles per hour.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

22411.

No person shall operate a motorized scooter at a speed in excess of 15 miles per hour.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22413.

Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the prima facie limit of 25 miles per hour is more than is reasonable and safe on any portion of a street having a grade in excess of 10 percent, the local authority may by ordinance determine and declare a maximum limit of 20 or 15 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate and is reasonable and safe. The declared maximum speed shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 318.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Speed Safety System Pilot Program [22425. - 22431.]

22425.

(a) As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Automated speed violation” means a violation of a speed law detected by a speed safety system operated pursuant to this article.

(2) “Designated jurisdiction” means any of the Cities of Los Angeles, San Jose, Oakland, Glendale, or Long Beach, or the City and County of San Francisco.

(3) A person is “indigent” if either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The person meets the income criteria set forth in
 subdivision (b) of Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(B) The person receives public benefits from a program listed in subdivision (a) of Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(4) “Local department of transportation” means a designated jurisdiction’s department of transportation or, if a designated
 jurisdiction does not have a department of transportation, their administrative division, including, but not limited to, a public works department that administers transportation and traffic matters under this code.

(5) “School zone” means an area described by subdivision (b) of Section 40802.

(6) “Speed safety system” or “system” means a fixed or mobile radar or laser system or any other electronic device that utilizes automated
 equipment to detect a violation of speed laws and obtains a clear photograph of a speeding vehicle’s license plate.

(b) (1) A designated jurisdiction may establish a program for speed enforcement that utilizes a speed safety system, to be operated by a local department of transportation, in the following areas:

(A) On a street meeting the standards of a safety corridor under Section 22358.7.

(B) On a street a local authority has determined to have had a high number of incidents for motor vehicle speed contests or motor vehicle exhibitions of speed. For the purposes of this provision, a high number of incidents shall be calls for law enforcement to respond to the area for at least four separate incidences of a motor vehicle speed contest or motor vehicle exhibition of speed within the last two years before the placement of the speed safety system.

(C) School zones, subject to subdivision (c).

(2) The number of speed safety systems operated by a designated jurisdiction at any time shall be limited as follows:

(A) For a jurisdiction with a population over 3,000,000, as determined by the United States Census Bureau in the 2020 Census, no more than 125 systems.

(B) For a jurisdiction with a population between 800,000 and 3,000,000, inclusive, as determined by the United States Census Bureau in the 2020 Census, no more than 33 systems.

(C) For a jurisdiction with a population of 300,000 up to 800,000, as determined by the United States Census Bureau in the 2020 Census, no more than 18 systems.

(D) For a jurisdiction with a population of less than 300,000, as determined by the United States Census Bureau in the 2020 Census, no more than 9 systems.

(3) A speed enforcement program developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall place the speed safety systems in locations that are geographically and socioeconomically diverse. The designated jurisdiction shall describe how it has complied with this provision in the Speed Safety System Impact Report described in subdivision (h).

(c) If a speed safety system is deployed in a school zone and the school zone has a higher posted speed limit when children are not present, a designated jurisdiction may
 only enforce the school zone speed limit up to one hour before the regular school session begins, 10 minutes after school begins, one hour during lunch period, and up to one hour after regular school session concludes. For these school zones, flashing beacons activated by a time clock, other automatic device, or manual activation shall be installed on a school zone sign and be active to indicate the times during which the school zone speed limit is enforced with a speed safety system.

(d) A speed safety system may be utilized
 pursuant to subdivision (b) if the program meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Clearly identifies the presence of the speed safety system by signs stating “Photo Enforced,” along with the posted speed limit no more than 500 feet before the placement of the system. The signs shall be visible to traffic traveling on the street from the direction of travel for which the system is utilized, and shall be posted at all locations as may be determined necessary by the Department of Transportation
 after consultation with the California Traffic Control Devices Committee.

(2) Identifies the streets or portions of streets that have been approved for enforcement using a speed safety system and the hours of enforcement on the municipality’s internet website, which shall be updated whenever the municipality changes locations of enforcement.

(3) Ensures that the speed safety system is regularly inspected, but no less than once every 60 days, and certifies that the system is installed and operating properly. Each camera unit shall be calibrated in accordance with the manufacturer’s
 instructions, and at least once per year by an independent calibration laboratory. Documentation of the regular inspection, operation, and calibration of the system shall be retained at least 180 days after the date on which the system has been permanently removed from use.

(4) Utilizes fixed or mobile speed safety systems that provide real-time notification to the driver when violations are detected.

(e) A speed safety system shall not be operated on any California state route,
 as defined in Section 231 of the Streets and Highways Code, including all freeways and expressways, United States highways, interstate highways, or any public road in unincorporated areas of any county where the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol has full responsibility and primary jurisdiction for the administration and enforcement of the laws, and for the investigation of traffic accidents, pursuant to Section 2400.

(f) Prior to enforcing speed laws utilizing speed safety systems, the designated jurisdiction shall do both of the following:

(1) Administer a public information campaign for at least 30 calendar days prior to the commencement of the program, which shall include public announcements in major media outlets and press
 releases. The public information campaign shall include the draft Speed Safety System Use Policy pursuant to subdivision (g), the Speed Safety System Impact Report pursuant to subdivision (h), information on when systems will begin detecting violations, the streets, or portions of streets, where systems will be utilized, and the designated jurisdiction’s internet website, where additional information about the program can be obtained. Notwithstanding the above, no further public announcement by the municipality shall be required for additional systems that may be added to the program.

(2) (A) Issue warning notices rather than notices of violation for violations detected by the speed safety systems during the first 60 calendar days of enforcement under the program. If additional systems are utilized on additional streets
 after the initial program implementation, the designated jurisdiction shall issue warning notices rather than notices of violation for violations detected by the new speed safety systems during the first 60 calendar days of enforcement for the additional streets added to the program.

(B) A vehicle’s first violation within a designated jurisdiction for traveling 11 to 15 miles per hour over the posted speed limit shall be a warning notice.

(g) The governing body of a designated jurisdiction shall adopt a Speed Safety System Use Policy before entering into an agreement regarding a speed safety system, purchasing or leasing equipment for a program, or implementing a program. The Speed Safety System
 Use Policy shall set forth the specific purpose for the system, the uses that are authorized, the rules and processes required to be followed by employees and contractors of the designated jurisdiction administering the system prior to its use, and the uses of the equipment and data collected that are prohibited. The policy shall
 identify the data or information that can be collected by the speed safety system and the individuals who can access or use the collected information, and the rules and processes related to the access, transfer, and use or use of the information. The policy shall also include provisions for protecting data from unauthorized access, data retention, public access, third-party data sharing, training, auditing, and oversight to ensure compliance with the Speed Safety System Use Policy. The Speed Safety System Use Policy shall be made available for public review, including, but not limited to, by posting it on the
 designated jurisdiction’s internet website at least 30 calendar days prior to adoption by the governing body of the designated jurisdiction.

(h) (1) The governing body of the designated jurisdiction also shall approve a Speed Safety System Impact Report prior to implementing a program. The Speed Safety System Impact Report shall include all of the following information:

(A) Assessment of potential impact of the speed safety system on civil liberties and civil rights and any plans to safeguard those public rights.

(B) Description of the speed safety system and how it works.

(C) Fiscal costs for the speed safety system, including program establishment costs, ongoing costs, and program funding.

(D) If potential deployment locations of systems are predominantly in low-income neighborhoods, a determination of why these locations experience high fatality and injury collisions due to unsafe speed.

(E) Locations where the system may be deployed and traffic data for these locations, including the address of where the cameras will
 be located.

(F) Proposed purpose of the speed safety system.

(2) The Speed Safety System Impact Report shall be made available for public review at least 30 calendar days prior to adoption by the governing body at a public hearing.

(3) The governing body of the designated jurisdiction shall consult and work collaboratively with relevant local stakeholder organizations, including racial equity, privacy protection, and economic justice groups, in developing the Speed Safety System Use Policy and Speed Safety System Impact Report.

(i) The designated jurisdiction shall develop uniform guidelines, consistent with the provisions of this section, for both of the following:

(1) The screening and issuing of notices of violation.

(2) The processing and storage of confidential information and procedures to ensure compliance with confidentiality requirements.

(j) Notices of violation issued pursuant to this section shall include a clear photograph of the license plate and rear of the vehicle only,
 identify the specific section of the Vehicle Code violated, the camera location, and the date and time when the violation occurred. Notices of violation shall exclude images of the rear window area of the vehicle.

(k) The photographic evidence stored by a speed safety system does not constitute an out-of-court hearsay statement by a declarant under Division 10 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Evidence Code.

(l) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the California Public Records Act, or any other law,
 photographic or administrative records made by a system shall be confidential. Public agencies shall use and allow access to these records only for the purposes authorized by this article or to assess the impacts of the system. Data about the number of violations issued and the speeds at which they were issued is not considered an administrative record required not to be disclosed by this section.

(2) Confidential information obtained from the
 Department of Motor Vehicles for the administration of speed safety systems and enforcement of this article shall be held confidential, and shall not be used for any other purpose. Designated jurisdictions agents shall establish procedures to protect the confidentiality of these records consistent with Section 1808.47.

(3) Except for court records described in Section 68152 of the Government Code, or as provided in paragraph (4), the confidential records and evidence described in paragraphs (1) and (2) may be retained for up to 60 days after final disposition of the notice of
 violation. The designated jurisdiction may retain information that a vehicle has been cited and fined for a violation for up to three years. The municipality may adopt a retention period of less than 60 days in the Speed Safety System Use Policy. Administrative records described in paragraph (1) may be retained for up to 120 days after final disposition of the notice of violation. Notwithstanding any other law, the confidential records and evidence shall be destroyed in a manner that maintains the confidentiality of any person included in the record or evidence.

(4) Photographic evidence that is obtained from a speed safety system that does not result in the issuance of a notice of violation shall be destroyed within five business days after the photograph was first made. The use of facial recognition technology in conjunction with a speed safety system shall be prohibited.

(5) Information collected and maintained by a designated jurisdiction to administer a program
 shall only be used to administer
 the program, and shall not be disclosed to any other persons, including, but not limited to, any other state or federal government agency or official for any other purpose, except as required by state or federal law, court order, or in response to a subpoena in an individual case or proceeding.

(m) Notwithstanding subdivision (l), the registered owner or an individual identified by the registered owner as the driver of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation shall be permitted to review and obtain a copy of the photographic evidence of the alleged violation.

(n) A contract between the designated jurisdiction and a manufacturer or supplier of
 speed safety systems shall allow the local authority to purchase materials, lease equipment, and contract for processing services from the manufacturer or supplier based on the services rendered on a monthly schedule or another schedule agreed upon by the municipality and contractor. The contract shall not allow for payment or compensation based on the number of notices of violation issued, or as a percentage of revenue generated, from the use of the system. The contract shall include a provision that
 all data collected from the speed safety systems is confidential, and shall prohibit the manufacturer or supplier of the contracted speed safety system from sharing, repurposing, or monetizing collected data, except as specifically authorized in this article. The designated jurisdiction shall oversee, maintain control, and have the final decision over all enforcement activities, including the determination of when a notice of violation should
 be issued.

(o) Notwithstanding subdivision (n), a designated jurisdiction may contract with a vendor for the processing of notices of violation after an employee of a designated jurisdiction has issued a notice of violation. The vendor shall be a separate legal and corporate entity from, and not related to or affiliated in any manner with, the manufacturer or supplier of speed safety systems used by the designated jurisdiction. Any contract between the designated jurisdiction
 and a vendor to provide processing services may include a provision for the payment of compensation based on the number of notices of violation processed by the vendor.

(p) (1) A speed safety system at a specific location shall be operated for no more than 18 months after installation of a system, unless one of the following thresholds has been met:

(A) A reduction in the 85th percentile speed of vehicles compared to data collected before the system was in operation.

(B) A 20-percent reduction in vehicles that exceed the posted speed limit by 10 miles per hour or more compared to data collected before the system was in operation.

(C) A 20-percent reduction in the number of violators who received two or more violations at the location since the system became operational.

(2) (A) Paragraph (1) does not apply if a designated jurisdiction adds traffic-calming measures to the street. “Traffic-calming measures” include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Bicycle lanes.

(ii) Chicanes.

(iii) Chokers.

(iv) Curb extensions.

(v) Median islands.

(vi) Raised crosswalks.

(vii) Road diets.

(viii) Roundabouts.

(ix) Speed humps or speed tables.

(x) Traffic circles.

(xi) Flashing beacons for school zone speed limits.

(B) A designated jurisdiction may continue to operate a speed safety system with a fixed or mobile vehicle speed feedback sign while traffic-calming measures are being planned or constructed, but shall halt their use if construction has not begun within two years.

(3) If the percentage of violations has not decreased by the metrics
 identified pursuant to paragraph (1) within one year after traffic-calming measures have completed construction, a designated jurisdiction shall either construct additional traffic-calming measures or cease operation of the system on that street.

(q) The speed safety system, to the extent feasible, shall be angled and focused so as to only capture photographs of speeding violations and shall not capture identifying images of other drivers, vehicles, or pedestrians.

(r) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 21455.6, the designated jurisdictions listed herein may use automated enforcement systems and photo radar for speed enforcement consistent with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 808, Sec. 4.   (AB 645)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 22431.)
-------------------------------------------

22426.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a violation of any speed law pursuant to this chapter that is recorded by a speed safety system authorized pursuant to Section 22425 shall be subject only to a civil penalty, as provided in subdivision (c), and shall not result in the department suspending or revoking the privilege of a violator to drive a motor vehicle or in a violation point being assessed against the violator.

(b) The speed safety system shall capture images of the
 rear license plate of vehicles that are traveling 11 miles per hour or more over the posted speed limit and notices of violation shall only be issued to registered owners of those vehicles based on that evidence.

(c) A civil penalty shall be assessed as follows:

(1) Fifty dollars ($50) for driving at a speed of 11 to 15 miles per hour over the posted speed limit.

(2) One hundred dollars ($100) for
 driving at a speed of 16 to 25 miles per hour over the posted speed limit.

(3) Two hundred dollars ($200) for driving at a speed of 26 miles per hour or more over the posted speed limit, unless paragraph (4) applies.

(4) Five hundred dollars ($500) for driving at a speed of 100 miles per hour or
 more.

(d) A civil penalty shall not be assessed against an authorized emergency vehicle.

(e) The notice of violation shall be in writing and issued to the registered owner of the vehicle within 15 calendar days of the date of the violation. The notice of violation shall include all of the following information:

(1) The violation, including reference to the speed law that was violated, the speed of the vehicle, the speed limit for the road on which the violation occurred, and verification of the most recent
 calibration of the system in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 22425.

(2) The date, approximate time, and location where the violation occurred.

(3) The vehicle license number and the name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle.

(4) A statement that payment is required to be made no later than 30 calendar days from the date of mailing of the notice of violation, or that the violation may be contested pursuant to Section 22427.

(5) The amount of the civil penalty due for that violation and the procedures for the payment of the civil penalty or for contesting the notice of violation.

(6) An affidavit of nonliability, and information of what constitutes nonliability, information as to the effect of executing the affidavit, and instructions for returning the affidavit to the processor. If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the processing agency within 30 calendar days of the mailing of the notice of violation, together with proof of a written lease or rental agreement between a bona fide rental
 company, as defined in Section 1939.01 of the Civil Code, or a personal vehicle sharing program, as defined in Section 11580.24 of the Insurance Code, and its customer that identifies the renter or lessee, the processing agency shall serve or mail a notice of violation to the renter or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability. If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the processing agency within 30 calendar days of the mailing of the notice of violation, together with proof of a copy of a police report
 indicating the vehicle had been stolen at the time of the violation, the processing agency shall not subject the registered owner to a civil violation.

(7) A proof of service consistent with Section 1013a of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) Mobile radar or laser systems shall not be used until at least two years after the installation of the first fixed radar or laser system unless the mobile radar or laser system is kept at a fixed location.

(g) (1) Revenues derived from any program utilizing a speed safety system for speed limit enforcement shall first be used to recover program costs. Program costs include, but are
 not limited to, the construction of traffic-calming measures for the purposes of complying with subdivision (p) of Section 22425, the installation of speed safety systems, the adjudication of violations, and reporting requirements as specified in this section.

(2) Jurisdictions shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for traffic-calming measures in order to remain authorized to participate in the pilot program, and shall annually expend not less than the annual average of expenditures for traffic-calming measures during the 2016–17, 2017–18, and 2018–19 fiscal years. For purposes of this subdivision, in
 calculating average expenditures on traffic-calming measures, restricted funds that may not be available on an ongoing basis, including those from voter-approved bond issuances or tax measures, shall not be included. Any excess revenue shall be used for traffic-calming measures within three years of the end of the fiscal year in which the excess revenue was received. If traffic-calming measures are not planned or constructed after the third year, excess revenue shall revert to the Active Transportation Program established pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of the Streets and Highways Code, to be allocated by the California Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 2381 of the Streets and
 Highways Code.

(h) A person shall not be accessed a civil penalty if they are subject to criminal penalties for the same act.

(i) A speed safety system may only be in operation for five years, or until January 1, 2032, whichever date is sooner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 808, Sec. 4.   (AB 645)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 22431.)
-------------------------------------------

22427.

(a) No later than 30 calendar days from the date of mailing of a notice of violation, the recipient may request an initial review of the notice by the issuing agency. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, electronically, or in person. There shall be no charge
 for this review. If, following the initial review, the issuing agency is satisfied that the violation did not occur, or that extenuating circumstances make cancellation of the notice of violation appropriate in the interest of justice, the issuing agency shall cancel the notice of violation. The issuing agency shall advise the processing agency, if any, of the cancellation. The issuing agency or the processing agency shall mail the results of the initial review to the person contesting the notice within 60 days of receipt of the recipient’s request for an initial review,
 and, if cancellation of the notice does not occur following that review, include a reason for that denial, notification of the ability to request an administrative hearing, and notice of the procedures adopted by the designated jurisdiction for the administrative hearing, including for waiving prepayment of the civil penalty based upon an inability to pay pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) If the person contesting the notice of violation is dissatisfied with the results of the initial
 review, the person may, no later than 21 calendar days following the mailing of the results of the issuing agency’s initial review, request an administrative hearing of the violation. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, electronically, or in person.

(2) The person requesting an administrative hearing shall pay the amount of the civil penalty to the processing agency. The issuing agency shall adopt a written procedure to allow a person to request an administrative hearing without payment of the civil penalty upon satisfactory proof of an inability to pay the amount due.

(3) The administrative hearing shall be held within 90 calendar days following the receipt of a request for an administrative hearing. The person requesting the hearing may request one continuance,
 not to exceed 21 calendar days.

(c) The administrative hearing process shall include all of the following:

(1) The person requesting a hearing shall have the choice of a hearing upon written declaration, video conference, or in person. An in-person hearing shall be conducted within the jurisdiction of the issuing agency.

(2) If the person requesting a hearing is an unemancipated
 minor, that person shall be permitted to appear at a hearing or admit responsibility for the automated speed violation without the appointment of a guardian. The processing agency may proceed against the minor in the same manner as against an adult.

(3) The administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with written procedures established by the issuing agency and approved by the governing body or chief executive officer of the issuing agency. The hearing shall provide an independent, objective, fair, and impartial review of contested automated speed violations.

(4) (A) The issuing agency’s governing body or chief executive officer of the designated
 jurisdiction
 shall appoint or contract with qualified independent examiners or administrative hearing providers that employ qualified independent examiners to conduct the administrative hearings. Examiners shall demonstrate the qualifications, training, and objectivity necessary to conduct a fair and impartial review, and shall meet the minimum requirements specified in subparagraph (B). The examiner shall be separate and independent from the notice of violation issuing and processing functions. An examiner’s continued
 employment, performance evaluation, compensation, and benefits shall not, directly or indirectly, be linked to the amount of civil penalties upheld by the examiner or the number or percentage of violations upheld by the examiner.

(B) (i) Examiners shall have a minimum of 20 hours of training. The examiner, unless an employee of the designated jurisdiction, is responsible for the costs of the training. The issuing agency may reimburse the examiner for those costs. Training may be
 provided through any of the following:

(I) An accredited college or university.

(II) A program conducted by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(III) A program conducted by the American Arbitration Association or a similar organization.

(IV) Any program approved by the governing body or chief executive officer of the issuing agency, including a program developed and provided by, or for, the agency.

(ii) Training programs shall
 include topics relevant to the administrative hearing, including, but not limited to, applicable laws and regulations, enforcement procedures, due process, evaluation of evidence, hearing procedures, and effective oral and written communication. Upon the approval of the governing body or chief executive officer of the issuing agency, up to 12 hours of relevant experience may be substituted for up to 12 hours of training. Up to eight hours of the training requirements described in this subparagraph may be credited to an individual, at the discretion of the governing body or chief executive officer of the issuing agency, based upon training programs or courses described in this subparagraph that the individual attended within the last five years.

(5) The
 employee of the designated jurisdiction who issues a notice of violation shall not be required to participate in an administrative hearing. To establish a violation, the issuing agency shall not be required to produce any evidence other than, in proper form, the notice of violation or copy thereof, including the photograph of the vehicle’s license plate, and information received from the Department of Motor Vehicles identifying the registered owner of the vehicle. The documentation in proper form shall be prima facie evidence of the violation. If
 the designated jurisdiction meets its initial burden the recipient of the notice of violation may present any evidence and argument in defense.

(6) The examiner’s final decision following the administrative hearing may be personally delivered to the person by the examiner or sent by first-class mail within 60 days of the date of the conclusion of the administrative hearing.

(7) Following a determination by the examiner that a person has committed the violation, the examiner may, consistent with the written
 guidelines established by the issuing agency, allow payment of the civil penalty in installments, or an issuing agency may allow for deferred payment or payments in installments, if the person provides evidence satisfactory to the examiner or the issuing agency, as the case may be, of an inability to pay the civil penalty in full. If authorized by the governing body of the issuing agency, the examiner may permit the performance of community service in lieu of payment of the civil penalty.

(8) If a notice of violation is dismissed following an administrative hearing, any civil penalty, if paid, shall be refunded by the issuing agency within 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 808, Sec. 4.   (AB 645)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 22431.)
-------------------------------------------

22428.

(a) Within 30 days after personal delivery or mailing of the final decision described in subdivision (c) of Section 22427, the contestant may seek review by filing an appeal to the superior court, where the case shall be heard de novo, except that the contents of the processing agency’s file in the case on appeal shall be lodged by the designated agency at the designated agency’s expense and be received into evidence. A copy of the notice of violation shall be admitted into evidence as prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the notice. A copy of the